Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8231
State trauma medical director, defined.

State trauma medical director means a physician licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act who advises the department and carries out duties under the Statewide Trauma System Act.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 31;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 63;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 690;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1304;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 104.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.